sms/test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-kuaerram_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Adjective - kuärram: # Adjective e-stem "sewing/ompeleminen" - full paradigm
     kuärram+N+Sg+Nom: kuärram
     kuärram+N+Sg+Gen: kuärram
     kuärram+N+Sg+Acc: kuärram
     kuärram+N+Sg+Ill: kuärrma
     kuärram+N+Sg+Loc: kuärrmest
     kuärram+N+Sg+Com: kuärrmin
     kuärram+N+Ess: kuärrmen
     kuärram+N+Par: kuärrmed
     kuärram+N+Sg+Abe: [kuärramtaa, kuärramtää]
     kuärram+N+Pl+Nom: kuärram
     kuärram+N+Pl+Gen: kuärrmi
     kuärram+N+Pl+Acc: kuärrmid
     kuärram+N+Pl+Ill: kuärrmid
     kuärram+N+Pl+Loc: kuärrmin
     kuärram+N+Pl+Com: kuärrmivuiʹm
     kuärram+N+Pl+Abe: [kuärrmitaa, kuärrmitää]
